Massachusetts, session 194th, H4772.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital
asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of conservation and
recreation, may grant permanent and perpetual easements located in the city of Lowell, over,
under and through portions of property owned by the commonwealth under the care, control and
use of the department of conservation and recreation for conservation and recreation purposes, to
the city of Lowell, solely for the purposes of construction, maintenance, access, operation,
replacement, repair, patrol, abandon and removal of outfall structures and laying of mainline
drains.
of 4

(b) The grant of easements pursuant to subsection (a) shall be subject to the requirements
of: (i) this section and sections 3 through 5, inclusive; and (ii) any additional terms and
conditions the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with
the commissioner of conservation and recreation, may prescribe.
(c) The portions of land, over, under and through which the easements may be granted
are more particularly described as 3 parcels of land located along the Merrimack river within the
city of Lowell, containing approximately 6,750 square feet of land shown as “Permanent
Easement” on a plan of land entitled “Bunker Hill Outfall Easement Plan” dated December 2024,
prepared by CDM Smith and on file with the city of Lowell. The 3 parcels are a portion of the
land described in an Order of Taking recorded in the Middlesex north registry of deeds in book
3830, page 70, which the commonwealth obtained for recreation and conservation purposes. The
parcel is further described in a plan of land entitled “Lowell Canal System” recorded in the
Middlesex north registry of deeds in plan book 157, plan 69.
(c) The terms of any easement granted pursuant to this section shall require that the
easement holder restore the surface condition to the equivalent or better condition as determined
by the department of conservation and recreation within 24 months after initiation of installation,
maintenance, repair and other work in the easement area.
SECTION 2. (a) The boundaries of any property interests to be conveyed pursuant to
section 1 shall be determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of conservation and recreation after the
completion of a survey.
of 4

(b) The grantee shall assume the cost of any appraisals, surveys and other expenses
deemed necessary by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance pursuant
to section 1.
SECTION 3. (a)(1) As a condition of the conveyance described in section 1, the city of
Lowell shall compensate the commonwealth through improvements to the department of
conservation and recreation property in the vicinity of the property described in subsection (c) of
section 1.
(2) Said improvements shall have a value: (i) equal to or greater than the fair market
value of the property described in section 1, or its value in use as proposed, whichever is greater,
as determined by an independent appraisal; or (ii) in a sum equal to the fair market value of the
property or its value in use as proposed, whichever is greater, as determined by an independent
appraisal; or through some combination thereof.
(b) All money paid to the commonwealth by the city of Lowell pursuant to the
conveyance authorized by section 1 shall be deposited in the Conservation Trust established in
section 1 of chapter 132A of the General Laws.
(c) Improvements required pursuant to subsection (c) of section 1 by the city of Lowell
shall be agreed to in advance by and completed to the satisfaction of the commissioner of
conservation and recreation.
SECTION 4. The value of the property described in section 1 shall be determined by an
independent professional appraisal prepared in accordance with the usual and customary
professional appraisal practice by a qualified appraiser commissioned by the commissioner of
capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of
of 4

conservation and recreation. The commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance
shall submit the appraisal and a report thereon to the inspector general for review and comment.
The inspector general shall review and approve the appraisal, and the review shall include an
examination of the methodology utilized for the appraisal. The inspector general shall prepare a
report of the review and file the report with the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance, and the commissioner shall submit copies of the appraisal, the report thereon and
the inspector general’s review and approval and comments, if any, to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the chairs of the joint committee on state administration and
regulatory oversight at least 15 days prior to the execution of the conveyance authorized by this
act.
SECTION 5. (a) No instrument conveying, by or on behalf of the commonwealth, an
easement described in section 1 shall be valid unless such instrument provides that the easement
shall be used solely for the purposes described in section 1. The easement instrument shall
include that in the event that the easement ceases to be used by the city of Lowell, or its
successors or assigns, for the purposes described in section 1, the easement shall revert to the
commonwealth under the care, control and use by the department of conservation and recreation,
upon the terms and conditions that the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of conservation and recreation, may
determine.
(b) If the easement reverts to the commonwealth, any further disposition of the easement
shall be subject to sections 32 to 38, inclusive of chapter 7C of the General Laws and the prior
approval of the general court.
of 4